Utah statutes.
8-4-3.   Withdrawals from endowment fund.
When the endowment care fund balance reaches $100,000, the cemetery authority
may withdraw the initial deposit of $25,000 at the rate of $1,000 for each
additional $3,000 added to the fund.
